Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3925.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin RESOURCES FOR VICTIMS OF TRAFFICKING.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the Office of Justice Programs for a grant to the International Institute of Minnesota to provide support and management services to 25 victims of trafficking. This includes helping survivors become stable, economically self-sufficient, and safe in local communities. The International Institute of Minnesota must partner with local law enforcement, shelters, health care providers, faith communities, and schools to identify victims of sex and labor trafficking in the seven-county metropolitan area and provide essential services including housing, medical care, food, as well as other educational and employment services. The International Institute of Minnesota must collect data and outcomes on all clients to measure the impact and accountability of money received. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end